Washington statutes.
RCW 21.30.050

Commodity merchants—Place for trading commodity contract or option—Requirements.

(1) No person may engage in a trade or business or otherwise act as a commodity merchant unless the person (a) is registered or temporarily licensed with the commodity futures trading commission for each activity constituting the person as a commodity merchant and the registration or temporary license has not expired, been suspended, or been revoked; or (b) is exempt from such registration by virtue of the commodity exchange act or a CFTC rule.

(2) No board of trade may trade, or provide a place for the trading of, any commodity contract or commodity option required to be traded on or subject to the rules of a contract market designated by the commodity futures trading commission unless the board of trade has been so designated for the commodity contract or commodity option and the designation has not been vacated, suspended, or revoked.

[ 1986 c 14 s 5.]